New York, session 2025-2026, A6868.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 141 of the labor law, as amended 2 by chapter 642 of the laws of 1991, is amended to read as follows: 3 1. If the commissioner finds that an employer has violated any 4 provision of this article or of a rule or regulation promulgated there- 5 under, the commissioner may by an order which shall describe particular- 6 ly the nature of the violation, assess the employer a civil penalty of 7 not more than [one] three thousand dollars for the first such violation, 8 no less than three thousand but not more than [two] five thousand 9 dollars for a second violation, and no less than five thousand but not 10 more than [three] ten thousand dollars for a third or subsequent 11 violation. Such penalty shall be paid to the commissioner for deposit in 12 the treasury of the state. In assessing the amount of the penalty, the 13 commissioner shall give due consideration to the size of the employer's 14 business, the good faith of the employer to believe that its conduct was 15 in compliance with the law, the gravity of the violation, the history of 16 previous violations and the failure to comply with record-keeping or 17 other requirements, provided, however, that where such violation 18 involves illegal employment during which a minor is seriously injured or 19 dies, such penalty shall be treble the maximum penalty allowable under 20 the law for such violation. For the purposes of this subdivision, a 21 minor shall be deemed to be seriously injured if such injury results in 22 a permanent partial or permanent total disability as determined by the 23 workers' compensation board. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11017-01-5